Rhode Island, session 2025, SB567.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-17 of the General Laws entitled "Licensing of Healthcare
Facilities" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-17-12.12. Licensed healthcare facilities for abortions.
(a) The licensed healthcare facilities that are used to perform abortions shall meet the same
licensing requirements as other similar healthcare facilities.
(b) All licensed healthcare facilities that are used to perform abortions shall be inspected
yearly to ensure that they are compliant with all applicable laws and regulations.
(c) The department of health may conduct unannounced inspections of those licensed
healthcare facilities that perform abortions.
(d) Any inspection that reveals a licensing requirement deficiency shall result in the
facilities having its license revoked.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000339
========